en: Iced coffees, Ice coffees
de: Eiskaffees, Eiskaffee
fi: jääkahvit
fr: Cafés glacés
hr: Ledene kave
hu: Jegeskávék, Jegeskávé
it: Caffè freddo
ja: アイスコーヒー
lt: Šalta kava, Šaltos kavos
nl: Ice coffees, Ice coffee, IJskoffie
tr: Soğuk kahve

en: Non-alcoholic wines, Alcohol-free wines
de: alkoholfreie Weine
fr: Vins sans alcool, vins déalcoolisés
hr: Bezalkoholna vina
hu: Alkoholmentes borok
ja: ノンアルコールワイン
lt: Nealkoholiniai vynai, Nealkoholinis vynas, Vynas be alkoholio
nl: Alcoholvrije wijnen, Alcoholvrije wijn
pl: Wino bezalkoholowe

en: Bordeaux wines, Bordeaux
xx: Bordeaux
de: Bordeauxweine
es: Burdeos, vinos de Burdeos
fi: Bordeaux
fr: Bordeaux, Vins de Bordeaux
hr: Bordeaux, Bordoška vina
hu: Bordeaux-i bor
it: Vini Bordeaux
nl: Bordeaux

en: Wines from France, French wines
bg: Френски вино
ca: Vi francès
de: französische Weine
es: Vinos de Francia, vinos franceses
fi: ranskalaiset viinit
fr: Vins français, vin français, vins de France, vin de France
he: יינות מצרפת
hr: Vina iz Francuske
hu: Francia borok
it: Vini francesi
ja: フランスワイン
ko: 프랑스 와인
lt: Prancūziški vynai, Vynas iš Prancūzijos
nl: Franse wijnen, Franse wijn
pl: Wina francuskie, Wina z Francji
pt: Vinhos da França, Vinhos franceses
ru: Французские вина
tr: Fransız şarapları
zh: 法国葡萄酒

fr: Alsace grand cru Rosacker, Rosacker
en: Alsace Grand Cru preceded by Rosacker
zh: Rosacker 产区阿尔萨斯特级葡萄酒

en: Burgundy wines, wines from Burgundy
de: Burgunder
fi: Bourgogne-viinit
fr: Bourgogne, vins de Bourgogne, vin de Bourgogne
hr: Bordo vina
nl: Bourgogne wijn, Bourgogne wijnen

en: Chablis
fr: Chablis

en: Côtes d'Auvergne
xx: Côtes d'Auvergne
fr: Côtes d'Auvergne
hr: Côtes d'Auvergne
nl: Côtes d'Auvergne

en: Maconnais wines
fr: Vins du Mâconnais
hr: Maconnais vina
nl: Wijn uit de Macon-streek

en: Medoc wines
de: Weine aus dem Medoc
fi: Medoc-viinit
fr: Vins du Médoc
hr: Medočka vina
hu: Medoc borok
nl: Médocwijn

en: Valençay Wine
fr: Valençay (Vin)

fr: Vins de pays, vin de pays
nl: Landwijnen

en: Wines from Albania, Albanian wines
de: Weine aus Albanien
es: Vinos de Albania
fr: Vins d'Albanie
hr: Vina iz albanije
hu: Albán borok
nl: Wijnen uit Albanië

en: Wines from Argentina
de: Weine aus Argentinien
es: Vinos de Argentina
fr: Vins d'Argentine
hr: Vina iz argentine
hu: Argentin borok
nl: Wijnen uit Argentinië

en: Wines from Armenia
de: Weine aus Armenien
fr: Vins d'Arménie
hr: Vina iz Armenije
hu: Örmény borok
nl: Wijnen uit Armenië

en: Wines from America, American wines
de: amerikanische Weine
fr: Vins américains
hr: Vina iz amerike
hu: Amerikai borok
nl: Amerikaanse wijnen

en: Wines from California, Californian Wines, California Wines
de: kalifornische Weine
fr: Vins californiens, vins de Californie, vin californien, vin de Californie
hr: Vina iz kalifornije
nl: Californische wijnen

en: Slovenian wines
de: Slowenische Weine
fr: Vins slovènes
hr: Slovenska vina
hu: Szlovén borok
nl: Sloveense wijnen
sl: Slovenska vina

en: Wines from Algeria
de: Weine aus Algerien
fr: Vins d'Algérie
hr: Vina iz alžira
hu: Algériai borok
nl: Wijnen uit Algerije

en: Wines from Australia, Australian Wines
de: Weine aus Australien
fr: Vins d'Australie
hr: Vina iz Australije
hu: Ausztrál borok
nl: Australische wijnen